North Carolina statutes. Chapter 39. Conveyances.
Article 8. Business Trusts.

§ 39-44.
Definition.

The term “business trust” whenever used or referred to in this Article shall mean any unincorporated association, including an Illinois land trust, a Delaware statutory trust, or a Massachusetts business trust, engaged in any business or trade under a
written instrument or declaration of trust under which the beneficial interest therein is divided into shares represented by certificates or shares of beneficial interest.

History.
1977, c. 768, s. 1; 2009-174, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-174, s. 1, effective October 1, 2009, and applicable to all instruments recorded on or after that date, substituted “an Illinois land trust, a Delaware statutory trust, or” for “but not limited to” near the middle.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on business associations, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 939 (1977).

§ 39-45.
Authority to acquire and hold real estate.

Business trusts are hereby authorized and empowered to acquire real estate and interests therein and to hold the same in their trust names and may sue and be sued in their trust names.

History.
1977, c. 768, s. 1.

§ 39-46.
Title vested; conveyance; probate.

Where real estate has been or may be hereafter conveyed to a business trust in its trust name or in the names of its trustees in their capacity as trustees of such business trust, the said title shall vest in said business trust, and the said real estate
and interests therein may be conveyed, encumbered or otherwise disposed of by said business trust in its trust name by an instrument signed by at least one of its trustees, its president, a vice-president or other duly authorized
officer, the said conveyance to be proven and probated in the same manner as provided by law for conveyances by corporations. Any conveyance, encumbrance or other disposition thus made by any such business trust shall convey good
and sufficient title to said real estate and interests therein in accordance with the provisions of said conveyance; provided, however, that with respect to any such conveyance, encumbrance or other disposition effected after June
28, 1977, there must be recorded in the county where the land lies a memorandum of the written instrument or declaration of trust referred to in

G.S. 39-44

. As a minimum such memorandum shall set forth the name, date and place of filing, if any, of such written instrument or declaration of trust, and the place where the written instrument or declaration of trust, and
all amendments thereto, is kept and may be examined upon reasonable notice, which place need not be a public office. Such memorandum may include designation of trustees and duly authorized officers and the authority granted to
them with regard to real estate matters, pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Any business trust may convey or encumber an interest in real property that is transferable by either (i) an instrument duly executed by either an officer of the business trust other than one of its trustees, its president, a vice president, or other
authorized agent identified in the recorded memorandum, or (ii) a declaration of trust described in subsection (a) of this section, if the conveyance has attached to it a signed resolution adopted by the board of trustees, as certified
by an officer authorized to make such certifications of the business trust, authorizing the officer to execute, sign, seal, and deliver deeds, conveyances, or other instruments. This section is deemed to have been complied with
if a resolution required by this subsection is recorded separately in the office of the register of deeds in the county where the land lies. Such a resolution shall be applicable to all instruments executed subsequently to the
recording of the resolution and pursuant to its authority.Notwithstanding the foregoing, this section does not require a signed resolution adopted by the board of directors, as certified by an officer authorized to make such certifications,
to be attached to an instrument or separately recorded in the case of an instrument duly executed by one of its trustees, its president, or a vice president of the business trust. All deeds, conveyances, or other instruments so
executed shall, if otherwise sufficient, be valid and shall have the effect to pass the title to the real or personal property described in the instrument. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the trust agreement, and absent
any provision otherwise in the recorded memorandum or declaration of trust required under subsection (a) of this section, when it appears on the face of an instrument registered in the office of the register of deeds that the instrument
was signed in the ordinary course of business on behalf of a business trust by at least one of its trustees, its president, a vice president, or an assistant vice president, such an instrument shall be as valid with respect to
the rights of innocent third parties for value without notice of a defect or breach of fiduciary duty as if executed pursuant to authorization from the board of trustees, unless the instrument reveals on its face a breach of fiduciary
obligation. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to parties who had actual knowledge of lack of authority or of a breach of fiduciary obligation.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to exclude the power of any representatives of a business trust to bind the business trust pursuant to express, implied, inherent, or apparent authority, ratification, estoppel, or otherwise.

Nothing in this section shall relieve trustees or officers of a business trust from liability to the business trust or from any other liability that they may have incurred from any violation of their actual authority.

History.
1977, c. 768, s. 1; 2009-174, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-174, s. 2, effective October 1, 2009, and applicable to all instruments recorded on or after that date, designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a), and in subsection (a), deleted “and attested or countersigned by
its secretary, assistant secretary or such other officer as is the custodian of its common seal, not acting in dual capacity, with its official seal affixed,” preceding “the said conveyance” in the first sentence, and added the last
sentence; and added subsections (b) through (d).

§ 39-47.
Prior deeds validated.

All deeds, leases, mortgages, deeds of trust or other conveyances heretofore executed in conformity with this Article and which are proper in all other respects are declared to be sufficient to pass title to real estate held by such business trusts in
accordance with the provisions of such instruments.

History.
1977, c. 768, s. 1.

§§ 39-48,
39-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.